test/src/gt-norm-yamls/P-simplex_gt-norm.yaml
     sama+Pron+Pl+Gen: samade
     sama+Pron+Pl+Par: [samasid, samu]
     sama+Pron+Pl+Ill: samadesse
     sama+Pron+Pl+Ine: samades
     sama+Pron+Pl+Ela: samadest
     sama+Pron+Pl+All: samadele
     sama+Pron+Pl+Ade: samadel
     sama+Pron+Pl+Abl: samadelt
     sama+Pron+Pl+Tra: samadeks
     sama+Pron+Pl+Trm: samadeni
     sama+Pron+Pl+Ess: samadena
     sama+Pron+Pl+Abe: samadeta
     sama+Pron+Pl+Com: samadega
     #
     setu+Pron+Sg+Nom: setu
     setu+Pron+Sg+Gen: setme
     setu+Pron+Sg+Par: setut
     setu+Pron+Sg+Ill: setmesse
     setu+Pron+Sg+Ine: setmes
     setu+Pron+Sg+Ela: setmest
     setu+Pron+Sg+All: setmele
     setu+Pron+Sg+Ade: setmel
     setu+Pron+Sg+Abl: setmelt
     setu+Pron+Sg+Tra: setmeks
     setu+Pron+Sg+Trm: setmeni
     setu+Pron+Sg+Ess: setmena
     setu+Pron+Sg+Abe: setmeta
     setu+Pron+Sg+Com: setmega
     setu+Pron+Pl+Nom: setmed
     setu+Pron+Pl+Gen: setmete
     setu+Pron+Pl+Par: setmeid
     setu+Pron+Pl+Ill: [setmetesse, setmeisse]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Ine: [setmetes, setmeis]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Ela: [setmetest, setmeist]
     setu+Pron+Pl+All: [setmetele, setmeile]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Ade: [setmetel, setmeil]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Abl: [setmetelt, setmeilt]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Tra: [setmeteks, setmeiks]
     setu+Pron+Pl+Trm: setmeteni
     setu+Pron+Pl+Ess: setmetena
     setu+Pron+Pl+Abe: setmeteta
     setu+Pron+Pl+Com: setmetega
     #
     kes+Pron+Sg+Nom: kes
     kes+Pron+Sg+Gen: kelle
     kes+Pron+Sg+Par: keda
     kes+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellesse
     kes+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelles
     kes+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellest
     kes+Pron+Sg+All: kellele
     kes+Pron+Sg+Ade: [kel, kellel]
     kes+Pron+Sg+Abl: kellelt
     kes+Pron+Sg+Tra: kelleks
     kes+Pron+Sg+Trm: kelleni
     kes+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellena
     kes+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelleta
     kes+Pron+Sg+Com: kellega
     kes+Pron+Pl+Nom: kes
     kes+Pron+Pl+Gen: [kellede, kelle]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Par: keda
     kes+Pron+Pl+Ill: [kelledesse, kellesse]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Ine: [kelledes, kelles]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Ela: [kelledest, kellest]
     kes+Pron+Pl+All: [kelledele, kellele]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Ade: [kelledel, kellel]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Abl: [kelledelt, kellelt]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Tra: [kelledeks, kelleks]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Trm: [kelledeni, kelleni]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Ess: [kelledena, kellena]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Abe: [kelledeta, kelleta]
     kes+Pron+Pl+Com: [kelledega, kellega]
     #
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Nom: kõik
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Gen: kõige
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Par: kõike
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Ill: [kõigesse, kõike]
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Ine: kõiges
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Ela: kõigest
     kõik+Pron+Sg+All: kõigele
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Ade: kõigel
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Abl: kõigelt
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Tra: kõigeks
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Trm: kõigeni
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Ess: kõigena
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Abe: kõigeta
     kõik+Pron+Sg+Com: kõigega
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Nom: kõik
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Gen: [kõikide, kõigi]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Par: kõiki
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Ill: [kõikidesse, kõigisse]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Ine: [kõikides, kõigis]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Ela: [kõikidest, kõigist]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+All: [kõikidele, kõigile]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Ade: [kõikidel, kõigil]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Abl: [kõikidelt, kõigilt]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Tra: [kõikideks, kõigiks]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Trm: [kõikideni, kõigini]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Ess: [kõikidena, kõigina]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Abe: [kõikideta, kõigita]
     kõik+Pron+Pl+Com: [kõikidega, kõigiga]
     #
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Nom: [ma, mina]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Gen: [minu, mu]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Par: mind
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Ill: [minusse, musse]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Ine: [minus, mus]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Ela: [minust, must]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+All: [minule, mulle]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Ade: [minul, mul]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Abl: [minult, mult]
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Tra: minuks
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Trm: minuni
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Ess: minuna
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Abe: minuta
     mina+Pron+Sg1+Com: [minuga, muga]
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Nom: [me, meie]
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Gen: [me, meie]
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Par: meid
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Ill: meisse
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Ine: meis
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Ela: meist
     meie+Pron+Pl1+All: meile
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Ade: meil
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Abl: meilt
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Tra: [meieks, meiks]
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Trm: meieni
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Ess: meiena
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Abe: meieta
     meie+Pron+Pl1+Com: meiega
     #
     mis+Pron+Sg+Nom: mis
     mis+Pron+Sg+Gen: mille
     mis+Pron+Sg+Par: mida
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ill: millesse
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ine: milles
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ela: millest
     mis+Pron+Sg+All: millele
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ade: [mil, millel]
     mis+Pron+Sg+Abl: [millelt, milt]
     mis+Pron+Sg+Tra: milleks
     mis+Pron+Sg+Trm: milleni
     mis+Pron+Sg+Ess: millena
     mis+Pron+Sg+Abe: milleta
     mis+Pron+Sg+Com: millega
     mis+Pron+Pl+Nom: mis
     mis+Pron+Pl+Gen: [millede, mille]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Par: mida
     mis+Pron+Pl+Ill: [milledesse, millesse]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Ine: [milledes, milles]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Ela: [milledest, millest]
     mis+Pron+Pl+All: [milledele, millele]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Ade: [milledel, millel]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Abl: [milledelt, millelt]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Tra: [milledeks, milleks]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Trm: [milledeni, milleni]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Ess: [milledena, millena]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Abe: [milledeta, milleta]
     mis+Pron+Pl+Com: [milledega, millega]
     #
     miski+Pron+Sg+Nom: miski
     miski+Pron+Sg+Gen: millegi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Par: midagi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Ill: millessegi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Ine: milleski
     miski+Pron+Sg+Ela: millestki
     miski+Pron+Sg+All: millelegi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Ade: [millelgi, milgi]
     miski+Pron+Sg+Abl: milleltki
     miski+Pron+Sg+Tra: [millekski, mikski]
     miski+Pron+Sg+Trm: millenigi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Ess: millenagi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Abe: milletagi
     miski+Pron+Sg+Com: millegagi
     #
     see+Pron+Sg+Nom: see
     see+Pron+Sg+Gen: selle
     see+Pron+Sg+Par: seda
     see+Pron+Sg+Ill: [sellesse, sesse]
     see+Pron+Sg+Ine: [selles, ses]
     see+Pron+Sg+Ela: [sellest, sest]
     see+Pron+Sg+All: sellele
     see+Pron+Sg+Ade: [sel, sellel]
     see+Pron+Sg+Abl: [sellelt, selt]
     see+Pron+Sg+Tra: [seks, selleks]
     see+Pron+Sg+Trm: selleni
     see+Pron+Sg+Ess: sellena
     see+Pron+Sg+Abe: selleta
     see+Pron+Sg+Com: sellega
     need+Pron+Pl+Nom: need
     need+Pron+Pl+Gen: nende
     need+Pron+Pl+Par: neid
     need+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nendesse, neisse]
     need+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nendes, neis]
     need+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nendest, neist]
     need+Pron+Pl+All: [nendele, neile]
     need+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nendel, neil]
     need+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nendelt, neilt]
     need+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nendeks, neiks]
     need+Pron+Pl+Trm: nendeni
     need+Pron+Pl+Ess: nendena
     need+Pron+Pl+Abe: nendeta
     need+Pron+Pl+Com: nendega
     #
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Nom: [sa, sina]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Gen: [sinu, su]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Par: sind
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Ill: [sinusse, susse]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Ine: [sinus, sus]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Ela: [sinust, sust]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+All: [sinule, sulle]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Ade: [sinul, sul]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Abl: [sinult, sult]
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Tra: sinuks
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Trm: sinuni
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Ess: sinuna
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Abe: sinuta
     sina+Pron+Sg2+Com: [sinuga, suga]
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Nom: [teie, te]
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Gen: [teie, te]
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Par: teid
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Ill: teisse
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Ine: teis
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Ela: teist
     teie+Pron+Pl2+All: teile
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Ade: teil
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Abl: teilt
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Tra: teieks
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Trm: teieni
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Ess: teiena
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Abe: teieta
     teie+Pron+Pl2+Com: teiega
     #
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Nom: ta
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Gen: ta
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Par: teda
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Ill: tasse
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Ine: tas
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Ela: tast
     tema+Pron+Sg3+All: talle
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Ade: tal
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Abl: talt
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Tra: temaks
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Trm: temani
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Ess: temana
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Abe: temata
     tema+Pron+Sg3+Com: temaga
     #
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Nom: tema
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Gen: tema
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Par: teda
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Ill: temasse
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Ine: temas
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Ela: temast
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+All: temale
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Ade: temal
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Abl: temalt
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Tra: temaks
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Trm: temani
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Ess: temana
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Abe: temata
     tema+Pron+Emph+Sg3+Com: temaga
     #
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Nom: [nad, nemad]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Gen: nende
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Par: neid
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Ill: [nendesse, neisse]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Ine: [nendes, neis]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Ela: [nendest, neist]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+All: [nendele, neile]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Ade: [nendel, neil]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Abl: [nendelt, neilt]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Tra: [nendeks, neiks]
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Trm: nendeni
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Ess: nendena
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Abe: nendeta
     nemad+Pron+Pl3+Com: nendega
     #
     too+Pron+Sg+Nom: too
     too+Pron+Sg+Gen: tolle
     too+Pron+Sg+Par: toda
     too+Pron+Sg+Ill: [tollesse, tosse]
     too+Pron+Sg+Ine: [tolles, tos]
     too+Pron+Sg+Ela: [tollest, tost]
     too+Pron+Sg+All: tollele
     too+Pron+Sg+Ade: [tol, tollel]
     too+Pron+Sg+Abl: [tollelt, tolt]
     too+Pron+Sg+Tra: tolleks
     too+Pron+Sg+Trm: tolleni
     too+Pron+Sg+Ess: tollena
     too+Pron+Sg+Abe: tolleta
     too+Pron+Sg+Com: tollega
     nood+Pron+Pl+Nom: nood
     nood+Pron+Pl+Gen: nonde
     nood+Pron+Pl+Par: noid
     nood+Pron+Pl+Ill: [nondesse, noisse]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Ine: [nondes, nois]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Ela: [nondest, noist]
     nood+Pron+Pl+All: [nondele, noile]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Ade: [nondel, noil]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Abl: [nondelt, noilt]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Tra: [nondeks, noiks]
     nood+Pron+Pl+Trm: nondeni
     nood+Pron+Pl+Ess: nondena
     nood+Pron+Pl+Abe: nondeta
     nood+Pron+Pl+Com: nondega
     #
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Nom: keegi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Gen: kellegi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Par: kedagi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Ill: kellessegi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Ine: kelleski
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Ela: kellestki
     keegi+Pron+Sg+All: kellelegi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Ade: kellelgi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Abl: kelleltki
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Tra: kellekski
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Trm: kellenigi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Ess: kellenagi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Abe: kelletagi
     keegi+Pron+Sg+Com: kellegagi
     #
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Nom: kumbki
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Gen: kummagi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Par: kumbagi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ill: [kumbagi, kummassegi]
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ine: kummaski
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ela: kummastki
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+All: kummalegi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ade: kummalgi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abl: kummaltki
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Tra: kummakski
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Trm: kummanigi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Ess: kummanagi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Abe: kummatagi
     kumbki+Pron+Sg+Com: kummagagi
     #
     ise+Pron+Sg+Nom: ise
     ise+Pron+Sg+Gen: [enda, enese]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Par: [end, ennast]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Ill: [endasse, enesesse]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Ine: [endas, eneses]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Ela: [endast, enesest]
     ise+Pron+Sg+All: [endale, enesele]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Ade: [endal, enesel]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Abl: [endalt, eneselt]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Tra: [endaks, eneseks]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Trm: [endani, eneseni]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Ess: [endana, enesena]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Abe: [endata, eneseta]
     ise+Pron+Sg+Com: [endaga, enesega]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Nom: ise
     ise+Pron+Pl+Gen: [eneste, endi]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Par: endid
     ise+Pron+Pl+Ill: [enestesse, endisse]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Ine: [enestes, endis]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Ela: [enestest, endist]
     ise+Pron+Pl+All: [enestele, endile]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Ade: [enestel, endil]
     ise+Pron+Pl+Abl: [enestelt, endilt]
